Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Inapplicability of implied warranties to injection, transfusion, or other transfer of blood, blood plasma, or transplanting of tissue, bones, or organs, §§

11-2-316

,

51-1-28

.

Examination and immunization of public school children, §§

20-2-770

,

20-2-771

.

Barbers and cosmetologists, T. 43, C. 10.

Anatomical gifts, §

44-5-140

et seq.

Liability for sale of unwholesome provisions of any kind or adulterated drugs, §

51-1-23

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, the article designations in this chapter were removed.

31-1-1.
Definitions.

Except as specifically provided otherwise, as used in this title, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Public Health.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of public health.

“Department” means the Department of Public Health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-1

; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-7/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-5/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-1-2.
Use of flammable materials in eyeglass frames; delivery of completed work by offices, companies, or laboratories; penalty.

No person shall distribute, sell, exchange, deliver, or have in his possession with intent to distribute, sell, exchange, or deliver in this state any prescription eyeglass frame or prescription sunglass frame containing any form of cellulose nitrate or other highly flammable material.

Optical offices, manufacturing companies, or laboratories which prepare lenses for prescription eyeglasses or sunglasses, including industrial safety eyewear, and which perform mechanical work upon inert materials in the preparation of such eyeglasses or sunglasses shall in every case deliver the completed product of their efforts only to the physician, optometrist, or licensed dispensing optician who ordered the work performed.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as follows: the first offense shall be punished by a fine of not more than $200.00; each subsequent offense shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500.00.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 92A-1901, 92A-9931, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 30, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 746, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 515, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references.

Dispensing opticians, T. 43, C. 29.

Optometrists, T. 43, C. 30.

Physicians, §

43-34-20

et seq.

31-1-3.
Detection of hearing impairments in infants; evaluations.

It shall be the public policy of this state that newborn infants in certain high-risk categories be evaluated for the detection of hearing impairments in order to prevent many of the consequences of these disorders.

The department shall develop guidelines for evaluation and follow-up procedures for the detection of hearing impairments in infants determined by the department to be in those high-risk categories in which the likelihood of such impairments is greatest and shall develop rules and regulations to ensure that all such high-risk infants are evaluated within one year of their birth. No such evaluation shall be made as to any newborn infant if the parents or legal guardian of the child objects thereto on the grounds that such a test would conflict with their religious tenets or practices.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 88-3301a, 88-3302a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1726, § 1.

31-1-3.1.
Reporting disabled newborn persons; referral to treatment and rehabilitative services.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure the registration by the department of disabled newborn persons in order that all such persons might obtain referral and other services provided by existing state agencies, departments, other organizations, and individuals.

As used in this Code section, the term “disabled newborn person” means a person less than 12 months old who is deaf, blind, or has a serious congenital defect as defined by the department.

Except as otherwise provided, every public and private health and social agency and every physician authorized to practice medicine in this state shall report to the department the name of any person such agency or physician has identified as being a disabled newborn person. The report shall be made within 48 hours after identification of that person and shall contain the name, age, address, type and extent of disability, social security number, if any, and such other information concerning that person as the department may require.

The department shall establish procedures whereby a disabled newborn person for whom a report is made under this Code section shall be referred with informed consent to appropriate public or private departments or agencies for treatment and rehabilitative services.

The department shall:

Maintain records of reports, notifications, and referrals made under this chapter; and

Maintain and update rosters of public and private departments or agencies which provide services to persons who have disabilities like those of disabled newborn persons and send copies of such rosters and an annual update thereof to each county board of health for those boards of health to make such rosters available to the public.

Statistical information collected under this Code section shall be available to any other federal or state agency or private organization concerned with disabilities of newborn persons, but no names or addresses will be provided without the consent of the immediate family or guardian of the disabled newborn person.

Any person or entity with whom the department enters into a contract after June 30, 1987, for services shall, as a condition of that contract, register with the department (formerly the Division of Public Health of the Department of Community Health) the various services that person or entity is capable of or is already providing to disabled newborn persons and persons having disabilities like those of disabled newborn persons for purposes of the roster of services the department maintains under paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of this Code section.

A person or entity which in good faith makes a report required by subsection (c) of this Code section shall be immune from civil and criminal liability therefor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 393, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 31; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 13, 14; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1585, § 2; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 5-9/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “chapter” was substituted for “article” near the end of paragraph (e)(1).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-1-3.2.
Hearing screenings for newborns.

The General Assembly finds, determines, and declares:

That hearing loss occurs in newborn infants more frequently than any other health condition for which newborn infant screening is required;

That 80 percent of the language ability of a child is established by the time the child is 18 months of age and that hearing is vitally important to the healthy development of such language skills;

That early detection of hearing loss in a child and early intervention and treatment has been demonstrated to be highly effective in facilitating a child’s healthy development in a manner consistent with the child’s age and cognitive ability;

That children with hearing loss who do not receive such early intervention and treatment frequently require special educational services and that such services are publicly funded for the vast majority of children with hearing needs in the state;

That appropriate testing and identification of newborn infants with hearing loss will facilitate early intervention and treatment and may therefore serve the public purposes of promoting the healthy development of children and reducing public expenditure;

The American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association, the American Academy of Audiology, and the American Academy of Otolaryngology, Head and Neck Surgery have recently endorsed the implementation of universal newborn hearing screenings and recommended that such screenings be performed in all birthing hospitals and coordinated by state departments of public health; and

That consumers should be entitled to know whether the hospital at which they choose to deliver their infant provides newborn hearing screening.

As used in this Code section, the term “newborn infant” means an infant after delivery but before discharge from the hospital.

For reasons specified in subsection (a) of this Code section, the General Assembly determines that it would be beneficial and in the best interests of the development of the children of the state that newborn infants’ hearing be screened.

Reserved.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that, by July 1, 2002, newborn hearing screening be conducted on no fewer than 95 percent of all newborn infants born in hospitals in this state, using procedures established by rule and regulation of the Board of Public Health after review of any recommendations of the advisory committee on hearing in newborn infants, created in former subsection (d) of this Code section. Toward that end, on and after July 1, 2001, every licensed or certified hospital and physician shall educate the parents of newborn infants born in such hospitals of the importance of screening the hearing of newborn infants and follow-up care. Education shall not be considered a substitute for the hearing screening described in this subsection. Every licensed or permitted hospital shall report annually to the Department of Public Health concerning the following:

The number of newborn infants born in the hospital;

The number of newborn infants screened;

The number of newborn infants who passed the screening, if administered; and

The number of newborn infants who did not pass the screening, if administered.

Reserved.

Reserved.

Reserved.

A physician, registered professional nurse, including a certified nurse midwife, or other health professional attending a birth outside a hospital or institution shall provide information, as established by the department, to parents regarding places where the parents may have their infants’ screening and the importance of such screening.

The department shall encourage the cooperation of local health departments, health care clinics, school districts, health care providers, and any other appropriate resources to promote the screening of newborn infants’ hearing and early identification and intervention for those determined to have hearing loss for those infants born outside a hospital or institution.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-3.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 266, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 1-4, 1-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, §§ 6-3, 6-4/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942.

Cross references.

Hearing handicap, T. 30, C. 1.

Rights of persons with visual disabilities and deaf persons, T. 30, C. 4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, in subsection (e), “, 2001” was substituted for “of the first year following the year this Code section first becomes effective” and “, 2002” was substituted for “of the second year following the year this Code section first becomes effective”.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “former” was inserted preceding “subsection (d)” in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1999, p. 266, § 1 provided for the repeal of former subsection (d), effective July 1, 2005.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-1-4.
Penalties for false representation, impersonation.

Any person who shall make, utter, execute, or submit to the department or to any county board of health any oral or written representation, knowing the same to be false, for the purpose of obtaining anything of value, including any service, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall impersonate or otherwise falsely hold himself out to any other person as an agent of the department or of any county board of health shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 222, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 88-9901, 88-9902, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Impersonating public officers or employees generally, §

16-10-23

.

31-1-5.
Compensation of employees for damage to wearing apparel caused by patients.

As used in this Code section, the term “wearing apparel” includes eyeglasses, hearing aids, clothing, and similar items worn on the person of the employee.

When action by a patient in one of the institutions operated by the department results in damage to an item of wearing apparel of an employee of the institution, the department shall compensate the employee for the loss in the amount of either the repair cost or the replacement value or the cost of the item of wearing apparel, whichever is less. Such losses shall be compensated only in accordance with procedures to be established by the department, and no compensation shall be made by the department in excess of $500.00 per claim.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2411, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 854, § 1.

31-1-6.
Reuse of heart pacemakers.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Heart pacemaker” means any electrical device which stimulates the heart muscle so that it contracts at a certain or regular rate.

“Medically acceptable” means conforming to prevailing medical standards of cleanliness and manufacturers’ applicable standards for functional operation.

“Person” includes the following:

Any hospital, surgeon, or physician;

Any accredited medical school, college, or university;

Any licensed, accredited, or approved bank or storage facility of human bodies or parts; or

Any specified individual needing implantation of a heart pacemaker.

Any person, as defined in subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be authorized to receive and reuse a heart pacemaker, provided that such device is medically acceptable for its proposed reuse.

This Code section shall not apply to the receipt and reuse of a nuclear-powered pacemaker.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1034, § 1.

Cross references.

Anatomical gifts, §

44-5-140

et seq.

Disposition of heart pacemakers, §

53-4-73

.

31-1-7.
Marking of dentures and other removable dental prostheses for identification.

Every complete upper and lower denture and removable permanent partial denture fabricated by a dentist licensed in Georgia shall be marked with the name or social security number of the patient for whom it is intended. The marking shall be done during fabrication and shall be permanent, legible, and cosmetically acceptable. The exact location of the marking and the methods used to apply or implant it shall be determined by the dentist.

If, in the professional judgment of the dentist, this marking is not practicable, the marking shall be as follows:

The initials of the patient may be shown if the use of the full name or social security number is impossible; or

The marking may be omitted entirely if none of the markings so specified are practical or clinically safe.

Any removable dental prosthesis in existence prior to July 1, 1988, shall be marked in accordance with this Code section at the time of any subsequent rebasing.

It shall be the duty of the Georgia Board of Dentistry to notify each person licensed to practice dentistry in this state of the requirements of this Code section. Such notification shall be mailed to the address of record of each person licensed to practice dentistry in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 742, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 600, §§ 1, 2.

31-1-8.
Notice of proposed special facility.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “special facility” means any of the following facilities:

A facility utilized for the diagnosis, care, treatment, or hospitalization of persons who are alcoholics, drug dependent individuals, or drug users as defined in paragraph (11) of Code Section 37-7-1; or

A facility operated by the Department of Human Services and used for the treatment and residence of delinquent children, provided such facility affords secure custody.

At least 30 days prior to the expenditure of state funds for any new or additional special facility by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or the Department of Human Services or an agency or board of health contracting with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or the Department of Human Services, such department or such agency or board shall notify the governing authority of the county and any municipality wherein the special facility is to be located and each member of the General Assembly whose Senate or House district includes any part of the property upon which the facility is to be located. Such notification shall include a description of the proposed special facility, including its proposed location, the category of patients or persons to be confined therein, and the maximum number of patients or persons to be so confined. The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or the Department of Human Services shall include such requirements in all departmental contracts entered into with such boards or agencies.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2120, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, in paragraph (a)(2), “Department of Human Services” was substituted for “department”, and, in subsection (b), “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities or the Department of Human Services” was substituted for “Department of Human Resources” three times, and “such department” was substituted for “the department” in the first sentence.

31-1-9.
Breast-feeding of baby.

The breast-feeding of a baby is an important and basic act of nurture which should be encouraged in the interests of maternal and child health. A mother may breast-feed her baby in any location where the mother and baby are otherwise authorized to be.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 464, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1139, § 1.

Cross references.

Newborn Baby and Mother Protection Act, §

33-24-58

.

Employer obligation to provide time for women to express breast milk for infant child, §

34-1-6

.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 209 (2002).

31-1-10.
State health officer; duties.

The position of state health officer is created. The Governor may appoint the commissioner of public health to serve simultaneously as the state health officer or may appoint another individual to serve as state health officer. Such officer shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. An individual appointed to serve as state health officer shall be licensed to practice medicine in this state.

The state health officer shall:

Perform such health emergency preparedness and response duties as assigned by the Governor; and

Be authorized to issue a standing order prescribing an opioid antagonist, as such term is defined in Code Section 26-4-116.2, on a state-wide basis under conditions that he or she determines to be in the best interest of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-3/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-6/HB 214; Ga. L. 2017, p. 22, § 5/SB 121; Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 3-2/HB 249.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, effective May 18, 2017, added the fourth sentence of subsection (a), and substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “The state health officer shall perform such health emergency preparedness and response duties as assigned by the Governor.” The second 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, made identical changes.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2017, p. 22, § 1/SB 121, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Jeffrey Dallas Gay, Jr., Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 143 (2017).

31-1-11.
No legal compulsion to participate in health care system; no legal prohibition on purchase or sale of health insurance in private health care systems.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Compel” includes penalties or fines.

“Direct payment” or “pay directly” means payment for lawful health care services without a public or private third party, not including an employer, paying for any portion of the service.

“Health care system”’ means any public or private entity whose function or purpose is the management of, processing of, enrollment of individuals for, or payment for, in full or in part, health care services or health care data or health care information for its participants.

“Lawful health care services” means any health related service or treatment to the extent that the service or treatment is permitted or not prohibited by law or regulation that may be provided by persons or businesses otherwise permitted to offer such services.

“Penalties or fines” means any civil or criminal penalty or fine, tax, salary or wage withholding or surcharge, or any named fee with a similar effect established by law or rule by a government established, created, or controlled agency that is used to punish or discourage the exercise of rights protected under this Code section.

To preserve the freedom of citizens of this state to provide for their health care:

No law or rule or regulation shall compel, directly or indirectly, any person, employer, or health care provider to participate in any health care system; and

A person or employer may pay directly for lawful health care services and shall not be required to pay penalties or fines for paying directly for lawful health care services. A health care provider may accept direct payment for lawful health care services and shall not be required to pay penalties or fines for accepting direct payment from a person or employer for lawful health care services.

Subject to reasonable and necessary rules and regulations that do not substantially limit a person’s options, the purchase or sale of health insurance in private health care systems shall not be prohibited by law or by rule or regulation.

This Code section shall not:

Affect which health care services a health care provider or hospital is required to perform or provide;

Affect which health care services are permitted by law;

Prohibit care provided pursuant to any statutes enacted by the General Assembly relating to workers’ compensation;

Prohibit the imposition by the General Assembly of conditions and limitations on the use or applicability of exemptions and deductions with regard to income taxation;

Affect laws or rules in effect as of January 1, 2009; or

Affect the terms or conditions of any health care system to the extent that those terms and conditions do not have the effect of punishing a person or employer for paying directly for lawful health care services or a health care provider or hospital for accepting direct payment from a person or employer for lawful health care services.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 755, § 1/SB 411.

31-1-12.
Hospitals to provide educational information to parents of newborns regarding pertussis disease and availability of a vaccine.

During the postpartum period and prior to discharge, each hospital shall provide parents of newborns educational information on pertussis disease and the availability of a vaccine to protect against such disease. Such educational information shall include, but not be limited to, information on the recommendation by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention that parents of newborns receive the vaccination during the postpartum period to protect the newborns from the transmission of pertussis.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require any hospital to provide or pay for any vaccination against pertussis.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 704, § 1/HB 249.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, Code Section 31-1-12, as enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 2-1, was redesignated as Code Section 31-1-13.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 enactment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article, “Health: Department of Public Health,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-1-13.
Hemophilia Advisory Board.

The commissioner of public health in conjunction with the commissioner of community health shall establish an independent advisory board known as the Hemophilia Advisory Board.

The following persons shall serve as nonvoting members of the Hemophilia Advisory Board:

The commissioner of public health or a designee; and

The commissioner of community health or a designee.

The following voting members shall be appointed by the commissioner of public health, in consultation with the commissioner of community health, and shall serve a three-year term:

One member who is a board certified physician licensed, practicing, and currently treating individuals with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders and who specializes in the treatment of these individuals;

One member who is a nurse licensed, practicing, and currently treating individuals with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders;

One member who is a social worker licensed, practicing, and currently treating individuals with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders;

One member who is a representative of a federally funded hemophilia treatment center in this state;

One member who is a representative of a nonprofit organization that has, as its primary purpose, the provision of services to the population of this state with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders;

One member who is a person who has hemophilia;

One member who is a caregiver of a person who has hemophilia; and

One member who is a person who has a bleeding disorder other than hemophilia or who is a caregiver of a person who has a bleeding disorder other than hemophilia.

The Hemophilia Advisory Board may also have up to five additional nonvoting members as determined appropriate by the commissioner and the commissioner of community health. These nonvoting members may be persons with, or caregivers of a person with, hemophilia or other bleeding disorder or persons experienced in the diagnosis, treatment, care, and support of individuals with hemophilia or other bleeding disorders.

Board members shall elect from among the voting board members a presiding officer. The presiding officer retains all voting rights.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum at any meeting held by the Hemophilia Advisory Board.

If there is a vacancy on the Hemophilia Advisory Board, such position shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

Members of the Hemophilia Advisory Board shall receive no compensation for service on the Hemophilia Advisory Board.

The Hemophilia Advisory Board shall meet at least quarterly and at the call of the commissioner, the commissioner of community health, or the presiding officer and follow all policies and procedures of Chapter 14 of Title 50, relating to open and public meetings.

The department shall provide reasonably necessary administrative support for Hemophilia Advisory Board activities.

The Hemophilia Advisory Board shall review and make recommendations to the commissioner and the commissioner of community health with regard to issues that affect the health and wellness of persons living with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders, including, but not limited to, the following:

Proposed legislative or administrative changes to policies and programs that are integral to the health and wellness of individuals with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders;

Standards of care and treatment for persons living with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders, taking into consideration the federal and state standards of care guidelines developed by state and national organizations, including, but not limited to, the Medical and Scientific Advisory Council of the National Hemophilia Foundation;

The development of community based initiatives to increase awareness of care and treatment for persons living with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders; and

The coordination of public and private support networking systems.

The Hemophilia Advisory Board shall, no later than October 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, submit to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination a report of its findings and recommendations. Annually thereafter, the commissioner of public health, in consultation with the commissioner of community health, shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the status of implementing the recommendations as proposed by the Hemophilia Advisory Board. The reports shall be made public and shall be subject to public review and comment.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 2-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-3/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “October 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, submit to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” for “January, 2012, and annually thereafter, submit to the Governor and the General Assembly” in the first sentence of subsection (g).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, Code Section 31-1-12, as enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 2-1, was redesignated as Code Section 31-1-13.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, “January 1, 2012” was substituted for “six months after the effective date of this Code section” in subsection (g).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 1-1/HB 214, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Parts I and II of this Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Hemophilia Advisory Board Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 1-2/HB 214, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that hemophilia and other bleeding disorders are devastating health conditions that can cause serious financial, social, and emotional hardships for patients and their families. Hemophilia and other bleeding disorders are incurable, so appropriate lifetime care and treatment are necessities for maintaining optimum health. Advancements in drug therapies are allowing individuals greater latitude in managing their conditions, fostering independence, and minimizing chronic complications. As a result, individuals are living longer and are healthier and more productive. However, the rarity of these disorders coupled with the delicate processes of producing clotting factor concentrates makes treating these disorders extremely costly. It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish an advisory board to provide expert advice to the state on health and insurance policies, plans, and programs that impact individuals with hemophilia and other bleeding disorders.”

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on Crimes and Offenses: Crimes Against the Person, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 19 (2018).